South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5486.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 6, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-6-120.  (A) The department shall conduct an annual review of all medications and forms of treatment for chronic and rare kidney diseases, and services for enrollees with a diagnosis of chronic or rare kidney disease, that are eligible for coverage under the South Carolina Medicaid program. The purpose of the annual review is to determine if the available covered medications, treatments, and services are adequate to meet the needs of enrollees with a diagnosis of chronic or rare kidney disease, and whether the department should seek to add additional medications, treatments, or services. (B) When conducting the annual review required by this section, the department shall solicit and consider input from the public, with specific emphasis on attempting to receive input from persons or groups with knowledge and experience in chronic and rare kidney diseases. (C) On or before January 15, 2027, and on or before January fifteenth each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the clerks of the Senate and the House of Representatives for distribution to the appropriate subject matter committees that details the findings from the annual review required by this section, as well as any recommendations to the General Assembly based upon those findings. The department shall publish the annual report required by this subsection on its website in a manner accessible by the general public. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----